Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-243
School district; provide information.

A school district shall make information about the school district and its schools, programs, policies, and procedures available to all interested people.

Laws 1989, LB 183, § 13;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-3413;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 47.